browser/locales/l10n/id/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/id.dic
tama/RA
ratna/A
arti/nkwa
pujangga/m
terobos/ay
bangkit/falnk
darmawisata/B
kelodan/M
apa/WMB
celana/umn
bangkai/m
bingkah/a
cangkel/T
bongkah/BS
mengeram/x
muncul/kln
disebutkan/g
dipamerkan/n
emas/BHPM
selesai/hkaf
dipelihara/kwn
paham/BS
hakimi/MUD
diskus/ji
telaah/PDM
celaan/K
katakan/DUPTW
peta/kai
pendek/QEPM
dikatakan/ng
menegak/w
decur/M
eksit/x
bungkus/TDPSM
sesama/num
asa/aR
aso/MT
perantara/ay
bohongan/K
percayakan/l
jaring/ya
keselamatan/num
tafsir/fkan
lambatnya/E
angkasa/dc
gang/A
anggarkan/UDM
menanya/jiwk
buar/i
buat/PRTDBMUWQE
mengoyak/w
kendur/MB
ujung/ng
gelapkan/DM
tuliskan/W
menyamakan/n
lumpuhkan/MD
bapak/zn
dihidang/w
dila/c
dikenakan/gn
mudah/SQE
kelobot/z
nas/ihn
walau/o
kemegahan/num
buatan/PR
sendalan/K
tawa/TK
korban/BMD
dini/S
kenaziran/n
singkat/QMDE
dibuka/nlkg
engkau/hl
angkat/WDMCTUBRP
personal/z
penyebar/y
pernyataan/mun
hanyutkan/DM
tingkap/a
membuta/k
keremus/M
dibuat/gnl
angkup/MT
lokasi/B
sektarian/z
tempatan/PK
bedakan/DMQ
menempel/ki
diri/TBP
ulur/af
pijak/RDBMP
urai/ayk
nasib/num
saran/mun
karat/SB
afiks/x
sarjana/F
buatnya/PMEQ
perwira/n
dinamai/lng
mengumpul/w
absolut/z
asaan/C
begitu/lah
menyusu/jki
menebar/kwi
kungkung/D
sebelas/Ka
buka/Pa
ditempel/i
seharus/g
cungap/MT
gaya/Bn
terjemah/ayk
jabatan/nmu
balas/fumayn
uji/DTPM
pungut/DMPW
menyuap/j
bendungi/U
meniup/wk
dada/nkmuaz
samaran/m
urusan/umn
kesan/MBT
sesak/MTB
bedung/a
sesap/MT
bayan/KTP
bangka/ij
mena/nca
pangku/lya
meni/h
awan/RMB
ditekankan/g
campin/S
hampir/ia
jumlahkan/MD
daga/PM
mengantisipasi/k
selesa/ij
menep/x
kembalikan/UDWM
kesut/T
kecondongan/B
ikuti/lD
remas/M
ancang/MBRD
bangsa/umcin
cekikik/a
tugas/knf
menghina/w
wangsa/A
pelihara/aykl
reputasi/n
homoseksual/z
bekuan/K
gunakan/QMDRE
mere/h
leluhur/nmu
dibasuh/gn
penggal/SUMPDTB
amatkan/Q
tanggung/yflka
pinggir/gan
panggil/UMTD
menyeling/ki
kenakan/DWUM
pisau/S
diagung/w
maklum/khl
dedahan/P
mendikte/k
kebas/fk
baham/M
biara/dcumn
tenggan/T
kuali/n
mak/yeai
mas/K
mat/ji
mau/mhno
rinci/aP
spesifik/x
rahim/numg
tak/KO
busana/BA
kupanggil/h
simbol/z
ingatkan/QRE
pemerasan/m
cunduk/B
jalani/MD
jelekkan/MD
mencoba/ink
dapa/PM
industrialis/x
mengharap/w
dapat/Mkinl
empat/Kbrpq
tel/ae
tem/ya
tes/PKO
ucap/MkT
menangani/n
hampiri/MUTW
kelemah/aye
dari/mun
sila/fk
bersamaan/K
menyendal/k
penodong/a
potong/ygal
pasang/MWSUDT
urut/ya
angah/TMR
dedes/M
ihwal/mun
ingin/ik
kian/S
berkati/MUTD
meteorologi/c
menyiram/jwk
keberatan/num
kandungan/mn
teliti/PMnD
tegaskan/UD
bijak/nl
percontoh/Pa
tunjuk/fi
sepuluh/RaK
peliharalah/WT
marga/A
membanding/wi
anglap/M
bagaikan/MQ
kedelapan/b
pengaruh/BT
diadakan/gn
daya/BZAQ
diajuk/e
pelanting/T
akanan/K
lintas/Mi
selebran/O
situ/lx
absurd/z
dalam/SBMQE
lalai/uk
cendekia/c
metropolis/x
sensus/ODM
bungaan/RB
kelola/PDMT
top/Sa
mendatang/j
murah/BPX
erat/MPQ
selekoh/BM
oleh/QnE
reruntuhan/n
murka/munli
pemanah/S
layan/PKZ
ancam/TMDP
dilaksanakan/nl
berat/SEQ
dihias/i
ceramah/BP
beres/f
mengubur/w
jerit/ay
beritakan/DWMU
dengarkan/QE
lembu/mhn
teman/umi
delapan/qKrp
dipercaya/jw
jera/P
inci/ERT
diberitakan/ng
wacana/Y
lab/K
aktinik/A
tuturkan/DM
kasih/eimuan
tebu/k
haram/kn
peternak/a
brutal/z
pikul/DTM
mengaku/kj
temui/WDM
kurung/ay
segar/PQ
bagaimana/S
jamah/MDU
saja/hl
paduan/R
olahraga/c
bega/c
kodrati/A
harta/mnc
membisik/i
curahkan/UDMW
menutup/nji
eksploit/x
menghangat/w
antaran/P
keinginan/num
borong/MDn
dorong/la
lubangi/DM
ketel/SB
tukarkan/E
sama/SBH
ketik/DM
susun/ya
susuk/e
upah/muayn
diasingkan/g
birokrat/z
tepatan/RBK
sentralisasi/MT
tahui/K
membalut/k
kabar/fnki
takuti/DW
benci/UDPM
menanding/j
jenak/S
sediakan/MWQDU
mengamat/i
belu/u
amfibol/z
jumpa/ji
ekor/BSPM
duta/n
kiraan/RY
teko/h
teks/O
mendorong/nm
samakan/MD
rendahkan/l
kirakan/QRE
pisahkan/DWT
luhur/X
membanting/wk
panen/FMD
hitam/kM
bibit/AP
agam/B
anak/PBS
perintahkan/WU
kembal/ji
jalanan/BCR
ekabahasa/c
drama/nc
pelanggar/ya
satu/falnk
kecil/TEMSQ
salahkan/MDQE
keledai/nm
seruyuk/M
bera/hku
dapatan/PK
korup/T
sol/O
belanja/fak
hidangan/un
memaku/w
suam/ij
ampelas/PM
lempari/D
dipeluk/g
bertentangan/h
asingan/PRK
waris/kiymua
bangkitkan/UM
warna/PBA
mencemooh/k
kepuk/B
suci/PX
kalian/S
imam/l
amatir/z
setahu/m
warta/ck
pendarah/ya
gemari/MUD
hakekat/n
sinkronis/x
imperial/z
kasihi/UMDW
penggembala/ya
pada/Knmu
telefon/i
sekembali/nu
kamu/lh
sembilan/Kpbqr
tiganya/C
binaraga/c
tuduh/kya
duduk/TPK
ras/PEBTK
sentil/TRM
cakra/d
targetkan/MD
bentar/SB
nasionalis/x
dibagi/gf
cita/AMB
serahkan/UDW
derek/M
kong/A
celoteh/B
melebar/k
selumbar/i
melempar/wjn
derma/c
mengintensipkan/n
bentur/MKT
dibawa/gnl
bahaya/nBh
coba/aP
menangkan/QDM
persembahkan/DUW
bahasa/RB
kara/RDA
bahari/c
menetap/w
berbisa/h
kelim/PBM
kelit/i
despot/z
sosialis/x
iring/STDBPM
pendapat/muy
masuk/nleai
dekapan/S
dihadap/fjwk
graf/DG
traktor/O
siapkan/EMQDR
kata/kmunlf
bantahan/RP
pembela/y
pembeli/n
perilaku/B
riak/T
rias/K
membulat/ki
ria/UP
inventaris/xn
besarnya/PQ
mudahnya/E
kuat/QSEXPM
besar/BMXEQTPS
lopor/P
musuh/nimu
berkemah/l
menghalang/j
coblos/MP
senandung/a
sembelihan/m
nazarkan/MW
bendahara/c
lenan/n
kaya/TRSQE
brom/z
mohonkan/D
dikubur/fwk
keemasan/H
atas/nymuai
mendegil/k
mendamba/w
dom/OER
don/ix
keteng/SM
bertumbuh/l
tandingan/R
penguat/a
libat/KST
rol/P
dimasukkan/lng
stan/O
pati/A
ambillah/W
nyatakan/DUM
ahlian/K
eksogam/i
kesesakan/u
disesah/n
berahi/h
keluar/kf
ilah/ji
bebar/BT
buang/ayl
singkapkan/MDW
dolan/a
cap/KBDM
menyelam/ki
cacau/MP
petik/DWTPM
dua/MQCHKSRB
duk/PKU
petir/SM
menengah/i
menyelip/w
perasa/y
perjalanan/umn
mudahlah/E
rum/So
satukan/EQMD
diberi/gwfnl
lambat/SBEQT
habis/iaknl
pemberitaan/mu
kapan/h
mekanis/x
ambil/UDTWPBM
bilateral/z
menyingkir/wl
hambur/af
imbuh/a
menyingkap/w
hindarkan/D
mengguncang/k
ukurlah/T
jajar/Sa
samaan/RBK
serengam/B
kehendak/umn
letakkan/DWUM
kedok/QB
matang/P
mengatas/jk
bersama/mun
hancurkan/MDU
kedua/rgbnqp
cit/KRM
syarat/YnB
versi/OR
hara/Y
pecut/M
raba/l
mencukur/kn
nasihat/munfik
belakang/numae
darat/aP
ah/RCUM
as/xa
maki/DM
pula/lh
ilmu/mcn
membotak/i
basuhlah/W
be/quhrl
bi/lu
bebang/T
bu/YUS
mala/K
terdidik/n
perabot/ayn
menunggang/j
rantau/P
didirikan/gln
perempuan/nlum
dipidana/wk
bekalan/R
salah/BPMH
alat/EBQ
da/huc
de/olzwuckh
mang/a
salin/BDM
ketepatan/B
atur/TBUWPMD
petisi/c
mereda/k
ingatannya/R
durno/z
ringis/P
dingin/MSP
kembali/lkafw
ditarik/ng
pimpin/MWPD
tinggi/XSTQM
pura/AB
mutiara/m
turut/Mli
bijaksana/X
kekuasaan/mun
idap/e
raja/AXDM
kepada/gt
menghadap/wj
tradisional/z
aksara/dc
sulit/EQS
biar/folk
terletak/l
lindungi/DM
letakkanlah/W
lambang/BMR
dakwaan/nm
kelanjar/MB
mati/lkfua
kerabatan/K
membarat/k
abaikan/MUTDW
bab/SK
bad/ayxi
bas/in
sediaan/RKP
pukul/PTDUWM
alkohol/z
alih/akw
memerintahkan/m
dwibahasa/c
pas/h
cipratan/K
tebal/SMQ
lewati/DM
bincangkan/QRE
demokratis/x
banyak/MSQETRB
lunak/KQ
tunai/fk
barbar/z
kamera/c
macam/HSB
kebaskan/M
tebus/MPWUD
memusing/k
ingatan/mun
penerangan/B
sultan/O
pendiri/ya
jiwa/nmu
diberikan/g
dramatis/x
sarana/Y
tiga/bKqnrp
caraka/d
iris/MD
sena/kc
bin/ji
bir/i
bis/MUT
nasional/z
se/qbpkhmr
si/ASK
naluri/n
jaga/anl
bilamana/h
tajam/R
terima/MPnD
langsung/k
apikan/Q
hitung/BWMDT
medik/x
hapuskan/WU
kapital/z
janjikan/UMBWD
waktu/Sn
boros/kw
adat/MTB
muka/PYB
putra/mn
sadar/nlki
antariksa/dc
akal/HBS
sesi/O
rayu/DM
alup/M
cerita/aknf
ini/lh
asuh/ya
amalgam/x
menyerendeng/k
purnakarya/c
enam/Kbpqr
senang/Qk
dekor/x
tujuh/Kqprb
pertiga/S
malam/nBa
tenaga/umn
didapat/jnfk
tekun/lin
tiru/a
selusur/TM
panjang/ESMQ
disederhanakan/n
kudus/fmnlk
anakkan/EQn
mayat/nm
liberal/z
adil/Pa
mendarat/ilk
bur/KU
cerca/M
galvanis/x
federasi/O
ingati/REQ
semprot/PDM
mendekat/lj
mengiring/j
ada/khBln
patriot/z
keruh/MB
jauh/nlkif
timbangan/nRum
belam/TM
suruhlah/W
mestinya/S
turunan/PnK
boga/BA
kerasulan/un
tegak/TMPCBS
tegas/MPEQS
desakkan/M
dicari/gnk
kera/hi
memukul/wnji
ulas/ay
otomatis/x
tahu/XSM
sebesar/n
lima/qpKbr
tempur/a
teguh/afk
sopan/B
air/imn
ragam/S
sematan/P
siswi/X
siswa/AX
dapati/UD
sukarela/mc
menjauh/ij
anggul/TBM
menerkup/k
dicelup/w
diat/x
dahuluan/KP
bola/GBM
minum/nlya
aduan/RP
juga/lh
